Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 78. Rehabilitation and Liquidation.
Sec. 21.78.200.
Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act.

AS

21.78.020

,

21.78.030

,

21.78.130

—

21.78.190

and

21.78.330

(1) — (4) and (6) — (12) constitute and may be referred to as the Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act.

The Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act shall be interpreted and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it. To the extent that its provisions when applicable conflict with other provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Uniform Insurers Liquidation Act shall control.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 71 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.210.
Deposit of money collected.

The money collected by the director in a proceeding under this chapter shall be from time to time deposited in one or more state or national banks, savings banks, and in the case of the insolvency or voluntary liquidation of a depositary that is an institution organized and supervised under the laws of this state, the deposits shall be entitled to priority of payment on an equality with any other priority given by the banking laws of this state. The director may deposit the money or any part of it in a national bank or as a trust fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.220.
Exemption from fees.

The director shall not be required to pay a fee to a public officer in this state for filing, recording, issuing a transcript or certificate, or authenticating a paper or instrument pertaining to the exercise by the director of any of the powers or duties conferred upon the director under this chapter, whether or not the paper or instrument is executed by the director or the director’s deputies, employees, or attorneys of record and whether or not it is connected with the commencement of an action or proceeding by or against the director, or with the subsequent conduct of the action or proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.230.
Borrowing on pledge of assets.

For the purpose of facilitating the rehabilitation, liquidation, conservation, or dissolution of an insurer under this chapter, the director may, subject to the approval of the court, borrow money and execute, acknowledge, and deliver notes or other evidences of indebtedness and secure the repayment of the same by the mortgage, pledge, assignment, transfer in trust, or hypothecation of any or all of the property, whether real, personal, or mixed, of the insurer, and the director, subject to the approval of the court shall have power to take any and all other action necessary and proper to consummate the loan and to provide for its repayment.
The director, shall be under no obligation personally or in an official capacity to repay a loan made under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.240.
Date rights fixed on liquidation.

The rights and liabilities of the insurer and of its creditors, policyholders, stockholders, members, subscribers, and all other persons interested in its estate shall, unless otherwise directed by the court, be fixed as of the date on which the order directing the liquidation of the insurer is filed in the office of the clerk of the court that made the order, subject to the provisions of this chapter with respect to the rights of claimants holding contingent claims.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.250.
Fraudulent transfers before petition.

A transfer made, or an obligation incurred, by an insurer within one year before the filing of a successful petition for rehabilitation or liquidation under this chapter is fraudulent as to then existing and future creditors if made or incurred without fair consideration, or with actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud either existing or future creditors. A transfer made, or an obligation incurred, by an insurer ordered to be rehabilitated or liquidated under this chapter that is fraudulent under this section, may be avoided by the receiver, unless the transfer or obligation was to a person who in good faith is a purchaser, lienor, or obligee for a present fair equivalent value. A purchaser, lienor, or obligee, who in good faith has given a consideration less than fair for the transfer, lien, or obligation may retain the property, lien, or obligation as security for repayment. The court may, on due notice, order a transfer or obligation to be preserved for the benefit of the estate, and in that event, the receiver shall succeed to and may enforce the rights of the purchaser, lienor, or obligee.

A transfer

of property other than real property is considered to be made when it becomes so far perfected that no subsequent lien obtainable by legal or equitable proceedings on a simple contract could become superior to the rights of the transferee under AS

21.78.252

;

of real property is considered to be made when it becomes so far perfected that no subsequent bona fide purchaser from the insurer could obtain rights superior to the rights of the transferee;

that creates an equitable lien is not considered to be perfected if there are available means by which a legal lien could be created;

not perfected before the filing of a petition for liquidation is considered to be made immediately before the filing of the successful petition.

The provisions of (b) of this section apply whether or not there is or was a creditor who might have obtained a lien or a person who might have become a bona fide purchaser.

A transaction of the insurer with a reinsurer is considered fraudulent and may be avoided by the receiver under (a) of this section if

the transaction consists of the termination, adjustment, or settlement of a reinsurance contract in which the reinsurer is released from a part of its duty to pay the originally specified share of losses that occurred before the time of the transaction, unless the reinsurer gives a present fair equivalent value for the release; and

a part of the transaction took place within one year before the date of filing of the petition through which the receivership was commenced.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 72 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.251.
Fraudulent transfer after petition.

After a petition for rehabilitation or liquidation has been filed, a transfer of the real property of the insurer made to a person acting in good faith is valid against the receiver if made for a present fair equivalent value, or, if not made for a present fair equivalent value, then to the extent of the present consideration actually paid, for which amount the transferee has a lien on the property transferred. The commencement of a proceeding in rehabilitation or liquidation is constructive notice upon the recording of a copy of the petition for, or order of, rehabilitation or liquidation with the recorder of deeds in the jurisdiction where the real property in question is located. The exercise by a court of the United States, or any state or jurisdiction, to authorize or effect a judicial sale of real property of the insurer in any county or borough in any state is not impaired by the pendency of a proceeding unless the copy is recorded in the county or borough before the consummation of the judicial sale.

After a petition for rehabilitation or liquidation has been filed, and before either the receiver takes possession of the property of the insurer or an order of rehabilitation or liquidation is granted,

a transfer of any of the property of the insurer, other than real property, made to a person acting in good faith is valid against the receiver if made for a present fair equivalent value, or, if not made for a fair equivalent value, then to the extent of the present consideration actually paid, for which amount the transferee has a lien on the property transferred;

a person indebted to the insurer or holding property of the insurer may, if acting in good faith, pay the indebtedness or deliver the property, or any part of it, to the insurer or upon the insurer’s order, with the same effect as if the petition were not pending;

a person having actual knowledge of the pending rehabilitation or liquidation is considered not to have acted in good faith;

a person asserting the validity of a transfer under this section has the burden of proof.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a transfer by or on behalf of the insurer after the date of the petition for liquidation by a person other than the receiver is not valid against the receiver.

Nothing in this section impairs the negotiability of currency or negotiable instruments.

History.

(§ 73 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.252.
Voidable preferences and liens.

A transfer of property of an insurer to or for the benefit of a creditor, for or on account of an antecedent debt, made by the insurer within one year before the filing of a successful petition for liquidation under this chapter, the effect of which might be to enable the creditor to obtain a greater percentage of the debt than another creditor of the same class would receive is considered a preference. If a liquidation order is entered while the insurer is already subject to a rehabilitation order, then a transfer is considered a preference if it is made within one year before the filing of the successful petition for rehabilitation, or within two years before the filing of the successful petition for liquidation, whichever time is shorter.

A preference may be avoided by the receiver if

the insurer was insolvent at the time of the transfer;

the transfer was made within the four months before the filing of the petition;

the creditor receiving it or to be benefited by it or the creditor’s agent had, at the time the transfer was made, reasonable cause to believe that the insurer was insolvent or was about to become insolvent; or

the creditor receiving it was an officer, or was an employee, attorney, or other person who acted in that capacity whether or not the creditor held such a position, or was a shareholder holding directly or indirectly more than five percent of a class of an equity security issued by the insurer, or was another person, firm, corporation, association, or group of persons with whom the insurer did not deal at arm’s length.

If a preference is voidable, the receiver may recover the property or, if it has been converted, the value of the property, from a person who has received or converted the property, except that if a bona fide purchaser or lienor has given less than fair equivalent value, the person has a lien upon the property to the extent of the consideration actually given by the person. If a preference by way of lien or security title is voidable, the court may, after notice, order the lien or title to be preserved for the benefit of the estate, in event the lien or title passes to the receiver.

The provisions of this subsection apply whether or not there are or were creditors who might have obtained liens or persons who might have become bona fide purchasers. A transfer

of property other than real property is considered to be made when it becomes so far perfected that no subsequent lien obtainable by legal or equitable proceedings on a contract could become superior to the rights of the transferee;

of real property is considered to be made when it becomes so far perfected that no subsequent bona fide purchaser from the insurer could obtain rights superior to the rights of the transferee;

that creates an equitable lien is not considered to be perfected if there are available means by which a legal lien could be created; or

not perfected before the filing of a petition for liquidation is considered to be made immediately before the filing of the successful petition.

A lien obtainable by legal or equitable proceedings

upon a contract is one arising in the ordinary course of a proceeding upon the entry or docketing of a judgment or decree, or upon attachment, garnishment, execution, or like process, whether before, upon, or after judgment or decree and whether before or upon levy; it does not include a lien that, under applicable law, is given a special priority over other liens that are prior in time; or

could become superior to the rights of a transferee, or a purchaser could obtain rights superior to the rights of a transferee within the meaning of (d) of this section, if the consequences would follow only from the lien or purchase itself, or from the lien or purchase followed by a step completely within the control of the respective lienholder or purchaser, with or without the aid of ministerial action by public officials; a lien could not, however, become superior and a person could not create superior rights for the purpose of (d) of this section through acts subsequent to the obtaining of a lien or subsequent to a purchase that requires the agreement or concurrence of a third party or that requires further judicial action or ruling.

A transfer of property for or on account of a new and contemporaneous consideration that is considered under (d) of this section to be made after the transfer because of delay in perfecting it, does not become a transfer for or on account of an antecedent debt if acts required by the applicable law to be performed in order to perfect the transfer against a lien or bona fide purchaser’s rights are performed within 21 days, or a period expressly allowed by the law, whichever is less. A transfer to secure a future loan, if a loan is actually made, or a transfer that becomes security for a future loan, has the same effect as a transfer for or on account of a new and contemporaneous consideration.

If a lien that is considered voidable under (b) of this section has been dissolved by the furnishing of a bond or other obligation, and the bond or other obligation has been indemnified directly or indirectly by the transfer or creation of a lien upon property of an insurer before the filing of a petition under this chapter that results in a liquidation order, the indemnifying transfer or lien is also considered voidable.

The property affected by a lien that is considered voidable under (b) and (g) of this section shall be discharged from the lien, and that property and the indemnifying property transferred to or for the benefit of a surety shall be transferred to the receiver, except that the court may order a lien to be preserved for the benefit of the estate, and the court may direct that a conveyance be executed as is proper or adequate to evidence the title of the receiver.

The court has jurisdiction of a proceeding by the receiver to hear and determine the rights of parties under this section. Reasonable notice of a hearing in the proceeding shall be given to all parties in interest, including the obligee of a releasing bond or other like obligation. If an order is entered for the recovery of indemnifying property in kind or for the avoidance of an indemnifying lien, the court, upon application of a party in interest, shall in the same proceeding determine the value of the property or lien, and if the value of the property is less than the amount of the indemnity or the amount of the lien, the transferee or lienholder may elect to retain the property or lien upon payment of its value, as determined by the court, to the receiver, within the time that the court fixes.

The liability of a surety under a releasing bond or other obligation shall be discharged to the extent of the value of the indemnifying property recovered or the indemnifying lien avoided by the receiver, or, if the property is retained under (i) of this section, to the extent of the amount paid to the receiver.

If a creditor has been preferred, and afterward in good faith gives the insurer further credit without security of any kind, for property that becomes a part of the insurer’s estate, the amount of the new credit remaining unpaid at the time of the petition may be set off against the preference that would otherwise be recoverable from the creditor.

If an insurer, directly or indirectly, within four months before the filing of a successful petition for liquidation under this chapter or at any time in contemplation of a proceeding to liquidate it, pays money or transfers property to an attorney for services rendered or to be rendered, the transaction may be examined by the court on its own motion or shall be examined by the court on petition of the receiver. The transaction may be held valid only to the extent of a reasonable amount to be determined by the court, and the excess may be recovered by the receiver for the benefit of the estate, except that if the attorney is in a position of influence in the insurer or an affiliate, payment of money or the transfer of property to the attorney for services rendered or to be rendered is governed by (b)(4) of this section.

An officer, manager, employee, shareholder, member subscriber, attorney, or other person acting on behalf of an insurer, who knowingly participates in giving a preference even though the person has reasonable cause to believe that the insurer is, or is about to become, insolvent at the time of the preference, is personally liable to the receiver for the amount of the preference. It is a rebuttable presumption that a preference was given with reasonable cause to believe the insurer is or is about to become insolvent if the transfer was made within four months before the filing of a successful petition for liquidation.

If a person receives property from the insurer, or the benefit of the property, and the preference for the property is found voidable under (b) of this section, the person is personally liable for the value of the property and shall account to the receiver for it.

Nothing in (m) or (n) of this section affects any other claim by the receiver against any person.

History.

(§ 73 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.253.
Claims of holders of void or voidable rights.

A claim of a creditor who has received or acquired a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance that is voidable under this chapter may not be allowed unless the creditor surrenders the preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance. If the avoidance is affected by a proceeding in which a final judgment has been entered, the claim may not be allowed unless the money is paid or the property is delivered to the receiver within 30 days after the date of the entering of the final judgment, except that the court having jurisdiction over the liquidation may allow further time if there is an appeal or other continuation of the proceeding.

A claim allowable under (a) of this section by reason of avoidance, whether voluntary or involuntary, or a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance, may be filed as an excused late filing under AS

21.78.292

if filed within 30 days after the date of avoidance, or within the further time allowed by the court under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 73 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, in (b) of this section, “AS

21.78.292

” was substituted for “AS

21.78.290

” to correct a manifest error in ch. 50, SLA 1990.

Sec. 21.78.260.
Priority of distribution.

The priority of distribution of claims from an insurer’s estate is in accordance with the order in which each class of claims is set out in this section. Every claim in each class must be paid in full, or adequate money retained for payment, before the members of the next class may receive payment. A subclass may not be established within a class.
The order of distribution of claims is

class 1: the costs and expenses of administration during rehabilitation and liquidation, including

the actual and necessary costs preserving or recovering the assets of the insurer;

compensation for all services rendered in the rehabilitation and liquidation;

any necessary filing fees;

the fees and mileage payable to witnesses;

reasonable attorney’s fees and other professional services rendered in the rehabilitation and liquidation;

the reasonable expenses of a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association that is handling claims;

class 2: reasonable compensation to employees for services performed, to the extent that the claim does not exceed two months of monetary compensation and represents payment for services performed within one year before the filing of the petition for liquidation or, if rehabilitation preceded liquidation, within one year before the filing of the petition for rehabilitation; principal officers and directors of the insurer are not entitled to the benefit of this priority except as otherwise approved by the receiver and the court; the priority in this paragraph is in place of any other similar priority that might be authorized by law as to wages or compensation of employees;

class 3: all claims under policies, including claims of the federal or a state or local government, for losses incurred, including third-party claims, and all claims of a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association; all claims under life insurance and annuity policies, whether for death proceeds, annuity proceeds, or investment values, shall be treated as loss claims; that portion of a loss for which indemnification is provided by other benefits or advantages recovered by the claimant, may not be included in this class, other than benefits or advantages recovered or recoverable in discharge of familial obligations or support, or by way of succession at death, or as proceeds of life insurance, or as gratuities; payment by an employer to an employee may not be treated as a gratuity;

class 4: claims under nonassessable policies for unearned premium or other premium refunds and claims of general creditors, including claims of ceding and assuming companies under contracts of reinsurance;

class 5: claims of the federal or a state or local government, other than claims under (3) of this section; claims, including those of a government body for a penalty or forfeiture, shall be allowed in this class only to the extent of the pecuniary loss sustained from the act, transaction, or proceeding out of which the penalty or forfeiture arose, along with reasonable and actual costs attributable to it; the remaining portion of the claims are in the class of claims set out in (7) of this section;

class 6: claims filed late, or any other claims other than claims under (7) and (8) of this section;

class 7: surplus or contribution notes, or similar obligations, and premium refunds on assessable policies; payments to members of domestic mutual insurance companies shall be limited in accordance with law;

class 8: the claims of shareholders or other owners, in their capacity as shareholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 74 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 53 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Sec. 21.78.270.
Setoffs and counterclaims.

Except as provided in (b) of this section and in AS

21.78.271

, a mutual debt or mutual credit between an insurer and another person in connection with an action or proceeding under this chapter shall be set off, and only the balance may be allowed or paid.

A setoff or counterclaim may not be allowed in favor of a person if the obligation of the

insurer to the person would not, at the date of the filing of a petition for liquidation, entitle the person to share as a claimant in the assets of the insurer;

insurer to the person was purchased by or transferred to the person with a view to its being used as a setoff;

person is to pay an assessment levied against the members or subscribers of the insurer, or is to pay a balance upon a subscription to the capital stock of the insurer, or is in any other way in the nature of a capital contribution; or

person is to pay premiums, whether earned or unearned, to the insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 75 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.271.
Recovery of premiums owed.

An

insurance producer, premium finance company, or any other person, other than the insured, responsible for the payment of a premium is obligated to pay an unpaid earned premium due the insurer at the time of the declaration of insolvency, as shown on the records of the insurer; neither a credit nor a setoff is allowed to an insurance producer or premium finance company for an amount advanced to the insurer by the insurance producer or premium finance company on behalf of, but in the absence of a payment by, the insured;

insured is obligated to pay an unpaid earned premium due the insurer at the time of the declaration of insolvency, as shown on the records of the insurer.

If there are grounds for believing that a person has violated this section, the director may initiate proceedings under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.230

.

Upon a finding of a violation of this section, the director may order a penalty of not more than $1,000 for each act in violation of this section and may suspend or revoke the person’s license issued under this title.

History.

(§ 76 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 101 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.78.272.
Reinsurer’s liability.

The amount recoverable by the receiver from reinsurers may not be reduced as a result of delinquency proceedings, regardless of a provision in the reinsurance contract or other agreement. Payment made directly to an insured or other creditor does not diminish the reinsurer’s obligation to the insurer’s estate unless the reinsurance contract provided for direct coverage of a named insured and the payment was made in discharge of that obligation.

History.

(§ 76 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.280.
Special claims.

A contingent and unliquidated claim may not share in a distribution of the assets of an insurer that has been adjudicated to be insolvent by an order made under this chapter, except that the claim shall be considered, if properly presented, and may be allowed to share if

the claim becomes absolute against the insurer on or before the last day for filing claims against the assets of the insurer; or

there is a surplus and the liquidation is, after that, conducted upon the basis that the insurer is solvent.

The claim of a third party that is contingent only on the third party claimant first obtaining a judgment against the insured shall be considered and allowed as if there were not a contingency.

A claim may be allowed even if contingent, if it is filed under AS

21.78.292

. It may be allowed and may participate in all distributions declared after it is filed to the extent that it does not prejudice the orderly administration of the liquidation.

A claim that is due except for the passage of time shall be treated as an absolute claim is treated, except that the claim may be discounted at the legal rate of interest.

A claim made under an employment contract by a director, principal officer, or person in fact performing similar functions or having similar powers, is limited to payment for services rendered before the issuance of an order of rehabilitation or liquidation under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 77 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.281.
Special provisions for third-party claims.

If a third party asserts a cause of action against an insured of an insurer in liquidation, the third party may file a claim with the receiver.

Whether or not the third party files a claim, the insured may file a claim on the insured’s own behalf in the liquidation. If the insured fails to file a claim by the date for filing claims specified in the order of liquidation or within 60 days after mailing of the notice required by AS

21.78.290

, whichever is later, the insured is an unexcused late filer.

The receiver shall make a recommendation to the court under AS

21.78.260

for the allowance of an insured’s claim under (b) of this section after consideration of the probable outcome of a pending action against the insured on which the claim is based, the probable damages recoverable in the action, and the probable costs and expenses of defense. After allowance by the court, the receiver shall withhold from the undistributed assets of the insurer as a reserve the amounts payable on the claim, pending the outcome of litigation and negotiation with the insured. If appropriate, the receiver may reconsider the claim on the basis of additional information and may amend recommendations made to the court. The insured shall be afforded the same notice and opportunity to be heard on all changes in the recommendations as in its initial determination. The court may amend its allowance. As claims against the insured are settled or barred, the insured shall be paid from the amount withheld the same percentage as was paid on other claims of like property, based on the lesser of (1) the amount actually recovered from the insured by action or paid by agreement plus the reasonable costs and expenses of defense, or (2) the amount allowed on the claims by the court. After all claims are settled or barred, any sum remaining from the amount withheld reverts to the undistributed assets of the insurer. Delay in final payment under this subsection is not a reason for unreasonable delay of the final distribution and discharge of the receiver.

If several claims founded upon one policy are filed, whether by third parties or as claims by the insured under this section, and the aggregate allowed amount of the claims to which the same limit of liability in the policy is applicable exceeds that limit, each claim as allowed shall be reduced in the same proportion so that the total amount of the claims equals the policy limit. Claims by the insured shall be evaluated as in (c) of this section. If an insured’s claim is subsequently reduced under (c) of this section, the amount available shall be apportioned ratably among the claims that have been reduced under this subsection.

A claim may not be presented under this section if it is or might be covered by a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association.

History.

(§ 78 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.290.
Notice to creditors and others.

Unless the court directs otherwise, the receiver shall give or cause to be given notice of the liquidation order as soon as possible after the date of the entry of the order of liquidation

by first class mail and telephone, to the insurance director, commissioner, or superintendent of each jurisdiction in which the insurer is doing business;

by first class mail to a guaranty association or a foreign guaranty association that is or that might become obligated as a result of the liquidation;

by first class mail to all insurance agents of the insurer;

by first class mail to all persons known or reasonably expected to have claims against the insurer, including all policyholders, at the person’s last known address as indicated by the records of the insurer; and

by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the locale in which the insurer has its principal place of business and in other locations that the receiver considers appropriate.

Notice to potential claimants under (a) of this section must state that a claimant shall file a claim with the receiver, along with the information required by AS

21.78.170(a)

, on or before the date specified in the notice. The time specified in the notice may not be less than six months after the date the liquidation order was entered. The liquidation need not require a person claiming a cash surrender value or other investment value in life insurance and annuities to file a claim. A claimant has a duty to keep the receiver informed of a change of address.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 79 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 74 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a)(1), deleted “either by telegram or” following “by first class mail and”.

Sec. 21.78.291.
Duties of agents.

A person who receives notice in the form prescribed in AS

21.78.290

that an insurer that the person represents as an agent is the subject of a liquidation order, shall, within 15 days after receipt of that notice, give written notice of the liquidation order as provided in this section. The notice must be in writing and shall be sent by first class mail to each policyholder or other person named in a policy issued through the agent by the insurer, at the last address contained in the agent’s records. A policy is considered to be issued through an agent if the agent has a property interest in the expiration of the policy, or if the agent has had in the agent’s possession a copy of the declarations of the policy at any time during the life of the policy, unless the ownership of the expiration of the policy has been transferred to another. The written notice issued under this section must include the name and address of the insurer, the name and address of the agent, identification of the policy impaired and the nature of the impairment, including termination of coverage as specified in AS

21.78.100(d)

— (g). Notice under this section by a general agent satisfies the notice requirement for an agent under contract to the general agent. Each agent obligated to give notice under this section shall file a report of compliance with the receiver.

An agent failing to give notice or file a report of compliance as required in (a) of this section is, after a proceeding under AS

21.06.070

—

21.06.240

, subject to a penalty of not more than $1,000 and suspension or revocation of the agent’s license issued under this title.

The receiver may waive the duties imposed by this section if the receiver determines that other notice to policyholders of the insurer under liquidation is adequate.

History.

(§ 80 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.292.
Filing of claims.

Proof of a claim shall be filed with the receiver, in the form required by AS

21.78.170

, on or before the last day for filing specified in the notice required under this chapter, except that proof of a claim for cash surrender value or other investment value in life insurance and annuities need not be filed unless expressly required by the receiver.

The receiver may, under the following circumstances, permit a claimant who makes a late filing to share in distributions, whether past or future, as if the claim was not late, to the extent that a payment does not prejudice the orderly administration of the liquidation:

the existence of the claim was not known to the claimant and the claim was filed as promptly as was reasonably possible after learning of it;

a transfer to a creditor was avoided under this chapter, or was voluntarily surrendered under this chapter, and the filing satisfies the conditions of AS

21.78.253

; or

the valuation under AS

21.78.180(d)

, of security held by a secured creditor, shows a deficiency, a claim for which is filed within 30 days after the valuation.

The receiver shall permit late-filed claims to share in distributions, whether past or future, as if they were not late, if the claims are claims of a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association for reimbursement of covered claims paid or expenses incurred, or both, after the last day for filing, and if the payments were made and expenses were incurred as provided by law.

The receiver may consider a claim that is filed late and that is not covered by (b) of this section and may permit it to receive distributions that are subsequently declared on any claims of the same or lower priority, if the payment does not prejudice the orderly administration of the liquidation. The late-filing claimant shall receive, at each distribution, the same percentage of the amount allowed on the claim as is then being paid to claimants of a lower priority, until the claim has been paid in full.

History.

(§ 80 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.293.
Receiver’s recommendation to the court.

The receiver shall review all claims filed in the liquidation and shall make further investigation that the receiver considers necessary. The receiver may compound, compromise, or negotiate the amount for which a claim will be recommended to the court, unless the receiver is required by law to accept a claim as settled by a person or organization, including a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association. As soon as practicable, the receiver shall present to the court a report of the claims against the insurer, along with the receiver’s recommendations. The report must include the name and address of each claimant and the amount of the claim finally recommended, if any. If the insurer has issued annuities or life insurance policies, the receiver shall report the persons to whom, according to the records of the insurer, amounts are owed as cash surrender values or other investment values, and the amounts owed.

The court shall review and adopt the receiver’s report on claims by approving those claims that are supported by substantial evidence and disapproving allowed claims that are not supported by substantial evidence. Claims in a report that are not disapproved by the court within a period of 120 days following submission by the receiver shall be treated by the receiver as allowed claims.

History.

(§ 80 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 98 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.78.294.
Distribution of assets.

Under the direction of the court, the receiver shall distribute assets in a manner that will assure the proper recognition of priorities and a reasonable balance between the expeditious completion of the liquidation and the protection of unliquidated and undetermined claims, including third-party claims.
Distribution of assets in kind may be made at valuations set by agreement between the receiver and the creditor, and approved by the court.

History.

(§ 80 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.295.
Unclaimed and withheld money.

All unclaimed money that is subject to distribution and remains in the receiver’s hands when the receiver is ready to apply to the court for discharge, including the amount distributable to a creditor, shareholder, member, or other person who is unknown and cannot be found, shall be deposited with the Department of Revenue and shall be paid, without interest, to the person entitled to receive it or to the person’s legal representative upon proof satisfactory to the Department of Revenue of the person’s right to it. Notwithstanding the provisions of AS 34.45, an amount on deposit with the Department of Revenue that is not claimed within six years after the discharge of the receiver is considered to be abandoned and shall, without further proceedings, be deposited in the general fund.

All money retained for claims described in AS

21.78.280

and not distributed, shall, upon discharge of the receiver, be deposited with the Department of Revenue and paid in accordance with AS

21.78.260

. Any amount remaining that, under AS

21.78.260

, would revert to the undistributed assets of the insurer, shall be transferred to the Department of Revenue. Remaining amounts become the property of the state under (a) of this section, unless the director, in the director’s discretion, petitions the court to reopen the liquidation under AS

21.78.297

.

History.

(§ 80 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.296.
Termination of proceedings.

When all assets justifying the expense of collection and distribution have been collected and distributed under this chapter, the receiver shall apply to the court for discharge. The court may grant the discharge and make additional orders the court considers appropriate.

Any other person may apply to the court at any time for an order under (a) of this section. If the application is denied, the applicant shall pay the receiver’s costs and expenses incurred in resisting the application, including a reasonable attorney fee.

History.

(§ 80 ch 50 SLA 1990)